North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-28 State Tuition Fund

15.1-28-01.
State tuition fund — Source.

The net proceeds of fines for the violation of state laws and distributions received from the common schools trust fund must be paid into the state treasury and constitute the state tuition fund.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 12; 2005, ch. 173, § 1.

Cross-References.

Fines paid into state school fund, see

N.D. Const., art. IX, § 2; N.D.C.C. § 29-27-02.1.

School district special reserve fund, see N.D.C.C. ch. 57-19.

15.1-28-02.
Reports of county treasurer.

The county treasurer shall collect the net proceeds of all fines for violation of state laws and shall forward the amounts collected, together with a detailed statement of the moneys collected, to the state treasurer on or before the fifteenth of each month.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 12; 2005, ch. 174, § 1.

15.1-28-03.
State tuition fund — Apportionment — Payment.

On or before the third Monday in each January, February, March, April, August, September, October, November, and December, the office of management and budget shall certify to the superintendent of public instruction the amount of the state tuition fund. The superintendent shall include the amount certified in determining the state aid payments to which each school district is entitled under chapter 15.1-27.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 12; 2005, ch. 167, § 21; 2007, ch. 163, § 28.